Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1123.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.3 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended to read:Section 635.3. Coverage for Colorectal Cancer Screening Tests.--(a) [Except to the extent already covered under another 12345678910111213141516171819 policy, all health insurance policies as defined in this section shall also] A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for colorectal cancer screening tests for covered individuals in accordance with [American Cancer Society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening published as of [January 1, 2008] May 30, 2018] APPROVED MEDICAL GUIDELINES, and consistent with approved medical standards and practices[.] in accordance with the following:(1) Coverage for nonsymptomatic covered individuals who are [fifty (50)] forty-five (45) years of age or older shall include, but not be limited to:(i) An annual fecal occult blood test or fecal immunochemical test.(ii) A sigmoidoscopy, [a screening barium enema] computed tomography (CT) colonography or a test consistent with approved medical standards and practices to detect colon cancer, at least once every five (5) years.(iii) A colonoscopy at least once every ten (10) years.(iv) A multi-target stool DNA test every one (1) to three (3) years.(V) MULTI-TARGET STOOL RNA TEST EVERY THREE (3) YEARS.(VI) CELL-FREE DNA TEST OR OTHER BLOOD-BASED SCREENING TEST RECOMMENDED UNDER THE APPROVED MEDICAL GUIDELINES EVERY THREE (3) YEARS.(2) Coverage for symptomatic covered individuals shall include a colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or any combination of colorectal cancer screening tests at a frequency determined by a treating physician.(3) Coverage for nonsymptomatic covered individuals who are 20250HB1123PN3726 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at high or increased risk for colorectal cancer who are under [fifty (50)] forty-five (45) years of age shall include a colonoscopy or any combination of colorectal cancer screening tests in accordance with the [American Cancer Society guidelines] U.S. Multi-Society Task Force recommendations on screening for colorectal cancer published as of [January 1, 2008] June 6, 2017.(4) Coverage for all covered individuals shall include a follow-up colonoscopy conducted after a positive, noninvasive stool-based STOOL OR BLOOD-BASED screening test or a direct visualization test.(b) The coverage required under [this section shall be subject to] subsection (a)(1), (3) and (4) shall not be subject to cost sharing, including annual deductibles, coinsurance and copayment requirements [imposed by an entity subject to this section for similar coverages under the same health insurance policy or contract].(b.1) The coverage required under subsection (a) shall be subject to the following:(1) Article XXI of this act.(2) The terms and conditions of the health insurance policy if the terms and conditions are consistent with this section.(3) Applicable Federal laws, regulations and guidance.(b.2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Preclude an insurer from applying utilization review under Article XXI of this act.(2) Prevent the application of deductible, copayment or coinsurance provisions for colorectal cancer screenings beyond the minimum coverage required under subsection (a).(c) For the purpose of this section:20250HB1123PN3726 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "Health insurance policy" [means any group health, sickness or accident policy or subscriber contract or certificate offered to groups of fifty-one (51) or more employes issued by an entity subject to any one of the following:(i) This act.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).] as follows:(i) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(ii) The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, hospital indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement, long-term care or disability income, workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance.(iii) The term does not include a grandfathered health care plan as defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 9103 (relating to definitions).(2) "Colonoscopy" means an examination of the rectum and the entire colon using a lighted instrument called a colonoscope.(3) "Colorectal cancer screening tests" means [any of the following] procedures that are furnished to an individual for the purpose of early detection of colorectal cancer, INCLUDING:(i) Screening fecal-occult blood or fecal immunochemical test.(ii) Screening flexible sigmoidoscopy.(iii) Screening colonoscopy.20250HB1123PN3726 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Screening barium enema.(v) [Screening test consistent with approved medical standards and practices to detect colon cancer] CT colonography.(vi) Multi-target stool DNA test.(vii) Screening test consistent with approved medical standards and practices to detect colon cancer.(VIII) MULTI-TARGET STOOL RNA TEST EVERY THREE (3) YEARS.(IX) CELL-FREE DNA TEST OR OTHER BLOOD-BASED SCREENING TEST RECOMMENDED UNDER THE APPROVED MEDICAL GUIDELINES EVERY THREE (3) YEARS.(4) "Nonsymptomatic person at high or increased risk" means an individual who poses a higher than average risk for colorectal cancer according to the [American Cancer Society guidelines] U.S. Multi-Society Task Force recommendations on screening for colorectal cancer as of [January 1, 2008] June 6, 2017.(5) "Symptomatic person" means an individual who experiences a change in bowel habits, rectal bleeding [or], persistent stomach cramps, weight loss [or], abdominal pain or other symptoms of colorectal cancer.(6) "Insurer" means an entity licensed by the Insurance Department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).20250HB1123PN3726 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) "Direct visualization test" means a sigmoidoscopy, computed tomography (CT) colonography or any other test that allows the interior of the colon to be visually observed.(8) "APPROVED MEDICAL GUIDELINES" MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) AMERICAN CANCER SOCIETY GUIDELINES FOR COLORECTAL CANCER SCREENING PUBLISHED AS OF MAY 27, 2026.(II) NATIONAL COMPREHENSIVE CANCER NETWORK GUIDELINES FOR COLORECTAL CANCER PUBLISHED AS OF JUNE 24, 2025.(III) CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES NATIONAL COVERAGE DETERMINATION 210.3 COLORECTAL CANCER SCREENING TESTS GUIDELINES PUBLISHED AS OF JANUARY 1, 2023.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1123PN3726 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324